Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-19] Annual report. The
corporation shall submit to the governor and the legislature, no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, a complete and
detailed report of its plans and activities. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next